Montana, session 2025, LC2213.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 50-22-101, MCA, is amended to read:
"50-22-101. Determination of death alive or dead. (1) An individual who has active circulatory
functions, active respiratory functions or potential for respiratory functions, or active brain functioning possesses
the expectation of continuing life and must be considered alive or with life.
(2) An individual who has sustained either irreversible cessation of circulatory and respiratory
functions or irreversible cessation of all functions of the entire brain, including the brainstem, is dead. A
determination of death must be made in accordance with accepted medical standards."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Severability. If a part of [this act] is invalid, all valid parts that are
severable from the invalid part remain in effect. If a part of [this act] is invalid in one or more of its applications,
the part remains in effect in all valid applications that are severable from the invalid applications.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****